Illinois, session 104th, HB3718.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Mental Health and Developmental 5Disabilities Code is amended by changing Section 3-210 as 6follows: 7    (405 ILCS 5/3-210)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 3-210)8    Sec. 3-210. Employee as perpetrator of abuse. When, based 9upon credible evidence, an initial investigation of a reported 10allegation of material obstruction of an investigation or of 11abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of a recipient of 12services indicates that it is reasonable to believe , based 13upon credible evidence, that an employee at of a mental health 14or developmental disability facility is the perpetrator of 15physical abuse, sexual abuse, non-de minimis financial 16exploitation (such as financial exploitation totaling a 17cumulative value equal to or greater than $20), egregious 18neglect, or material obstruction of an investigation, the 19abuse, that employee shall immediately be barred from any 20further contact with recipients of services of the facility. 21An employee barred from contact with recipients of services 22shall remain barred:23        (1) pending the outcome of any further investigation,   HB3718 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10513 KTG 20588 b1    prosecution, or disciplinary action against the employee; 2    or3        (2) until the Department of Human Services Office of 4    Inspector General independently determines that the 5    physical abuse, sexual abuse, non-de minimis financial 6    exploitation, egregious neglect, or material obstruction 7    of an investigation allegation or allegations against the 8    employee will be unsubstantiated or unfounded in the 9    Office of Inspector General's final investigative report.10    When, based upon credible evidence, an initial 11investigation of a reported allegation of abuse or neglect of 12a recipient of services indicates that it is reasonable to 13believe that an employee at a mental health or developmental 14disability facility is the perpetrator of, at most, neglect, 15de minimis financial exploitation (such as financial 16exploitation totaling a cumulative value of less than $20), or 17mental abuse, the Department shall determine what appropriate 18steps should be taken as to the employee while the 19investigation of the Department of Human Services Office of 20Inspector General is pending. These steps by the Department 21may include, but not be limited to: training, re-assignment 22away from and a bar from contact with the alleged victim, being 23barred from any further contact with recipients of services of 24the facility, or pursuing discipline for known conduct. If 25further investigation reveals that the conduct rose to the 26level of physical abuse, sexual abuse, non-de minimis   HB3718 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10513 KTG 20588 b1financial exploitation, egregious neglect, or material 2obstruction of an investigation, then the employee shall be 3barred from contact with recipients of services and shall 4remain barred, subject to the conditions detailed in this 5paragraph. 6    For the purposes of this Section, "credible evidence" is 7any evidence that relates to the allegation or incident and 8that is considered believable and reliable.9    Nothing in this Section is intended to include an employee 10of a hospital licensed under the Hospital Licensing Act or 11operated under the University of Illinois Hospital Act or a 12hospital affiliate. 13(Source: P.A. 102-501, eff. 1-1-22.)